Rhode Island, session 2025, SB493.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-128.1 of the General Laws entitled "Lead Hazard Mitigation" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-128.1-15. Safe harbor provision for landlords.
(a) This section shall apply to any landlord required to obtain a lead certificate pursuant to
this chapter which landlord is unable to comply with the sections of this chapter regarding obtaining
a lead certificate due to the fact the state does not have adequate resources to conduct inspections
and enforce the current law.
(b) If a landlord meets the qualifications under subsection (a) of this section, the landlord
shall certify to the state that the landlord followed the lead mitigation law pursuant to this chapter
as of September 1, 2024.
(c) If a landlord meets the qualifications under both subsections (a) and (b) of this section,
the state shall not fine that landlord if the landlord’s property is not inspected and formally certified
by the state within the current statutory deadline.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002147
========